Utah statutes.
13-2-9.   Internet -- Consumer education.
(1)  The Division of Consumer Protection shall, subject to appropriation,
contract with a person to make public service announcements advising consumers
about the dangers of using the Internet, especially:
(a)  material harmful to minors;
(b)  steps a consumer may take to learn more about the dangers of using the
Internet;
(c)  information about how a service provider can help a consumer learn more
about the dangers of using the Internet, including the service provider's
duties created by this bill; and
(d)  how a consumer can monitor the Internet usage of family members.
(2)  Monies appropriated under Subsection (1) shall be paid by the Division of
Consumer Protection to a person only if:
(a)  the person is a nonprofit organization; and
(b)  the person agrees to spend private monies amounting to two times the
amount of monies provided by the Division of Consumer Protection during each
fiscal year in accordance with Subsection (1).
(3)  In administering any monies appropriated for use under this section, the
Division of Consumer Protection shall comply with Title 63G, Chapter 6, Utah
Procurement Code.
